Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-1003
Suburban development; powers of city council or village board of trustees; dedication of avenues, streets, and alleys.

The city council of a city of the second class or village board of trustees shall have power, by ordinance, to provide the manner, plan, or method by which the real property within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village may be subdivided, platted, or laid out, including a plan or system for the avenues, streets, or alleys to be laid out within or across the same. The city council or village board of trustees shall have the power to compel the owner of any such real property, in subdividing, platting, or laying out of same, to conform to the requirements of such ordinance and to lay out and dedicate the avenues, streets, and alleys in accordance therewith.

Laws 1957, c. 37, § 3, p. 204;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 308.
August 24, 2017